fi: Pöytäsuojan peittoalue: Taitettu; Taitettu ja peliasennossa; Peliasento; Muu
hu: Asztalborítás pozíciója: Összecsukott; Összecsukott és játék; Játék; Egyéb
hr-HR: Položaj pokrivanja tablice: Sklopljeno; Sklopljeno i u igri; U igri; Ostalo
vi: Vị trí bao phủ bảng: Đã gập; Đã gập và đang chơi; Đang chơi; Khác
es: Posición de cobertura de la mesa: Plegado; Plegado y en juego; En juego; Otro
fr: Position de la table couverte: Pliée; Pliée et en jeu; Jeu; Autre
nb: Borddekningsposisjon: Sammenlagt; Sammenlagt og i bruk; Slått opp; Annet
ru: Положение стола для совместимости с чехлом: Сложенное; Сложенное и для игры; Для игры; Другое
zh-TW: 球桌覆蓋位置: 折疊; 折疊與遊玩; 遊玩; 其他
ro-RO: Poziția de acoperire a mesei de ping-pong: Pliat; Pliat și deschis pentru joc; În joc; Altele
lt-LT: Stalo uždangalo padėtis: Sulankstyta; Sulankstyta ir žaidžiama; Žaidžiama; Kita
tr: Masa örtü uyum pozisyonu: Katlanmış; Katlanmış ve açık; Açık; Diğer
el: Θέση κάλυψης τραπεζιού: Διπλωμένο; Διπλωμένο και σε χρήση; Σε χρήση; Άλλο
ja: テーブルカバー位置: 折りたたみ時; 折りたたみ時・プレイ時; プレイ時; その他
nl: Tafel afdekpositie: Ingeklapt; Ingeklapt en spelend; Spelend; Overig
en: Table coverage position: Folded; Folded and playing; Playing; Other
sv: Skyddets placering på bordet: Hopfälld; Hopfälld och spelande; Spelläge; Annan
pt-PT: Posição de cobertura da mesa: Dobrada; Dobrada e em jogo; Em jogo; Outra
pl: Pozycja pokrycia stołu: Złożony; Złożony i w trakcie gry; W trakcie gry; Inny
it: Posizione della copertura del tavolo: Piegato; Piegato e in uso; In uso; Altro
zh-CN: 球桌罩适用状态: 折叠; 折叠且打球中; 打球中; 其他
sk-SK: Pozícia pokrytia stola: Zložený; Zložený a pripravený na hru; Pripravený na hru; Iná
bg-BG: Позиция на покривалото за маса: Сгъната; Сгъната и в игрална позиция; В игрална позиция; Друго
sl-SI: Položaj pokritosti mize: Zloženo; Zloženo in za igro; Za igro; Drugo
de: Position der Tischabdeckung: Zusammengeklappt; Playback-Position; Spielposition; Sonstige
ko: 탁구대 커버 적용 위치: 접힘; 접힌 상태에서 플레이; 플레이; 기타
da: Dækningsposition for bordtennisbord: Foldet; Foldet og spiller; Spiller; Andet
th: ตำแหน่งการครอบคลุมตาราง: พับเก็บ; พับเก็บและกางเล่น; กางเล่น; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Mesa posição de cobertura: Dobrada; Dobrada e de jogo; De jogo; Outra
cs: Poloha stolu k zakrytí: Složený; Složený a herní poloha; Herní poloha; Jiné